Hawaii statutes.
§101-17 Different properties in one action.
All property necessary for any public use may be united in one action. [L 1896,
c 45, §10; RL 1945, pt of §310; RL 1955, §8-15; HRS §101-17]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next